Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-213
Powers.

(MBCA 1.30) The Secretary of State has the
power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the Secretary
of State by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 13.
January 1, 2016